Georgia statutes. TITLE 39 Minors
Cross references.

Judicial proceedings involving juveniles generally, T. 15, C. 11.

Parent and child relationship, adoption, child custody proceedings,
T. 19.

Incarceration and training of youthful offenders, T. 42, C. 7.

Powers and duties of Department of Human Resources relating to children and youth services, §

49-5-1

et seq.